Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.030

Qualifications of applicants.

(1) An applicant for a license as a physical therapist shall have the following minimum qualifications:

(a) Be of good moral character; and

(b) Have obtained either (i) a baccalaureate degree in physical therapy from an institution of higher learning approved by the board or (ii) a baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher learning and a certificate or advanced degree from a school of physical therapy approved by the board.

(2) An applicant for a license as a physical therapist assistant must have the following minimum qualifications:

(a) Be of good moral character; and

(b) Have successfully completed a board-approved physical therapist assistant program.

(3) The applicant shall present proof of qualification to the board in the manner and on the forms prescribed by the board.

[ 2007 c 98 s 3; 1983 c 116 s 6; 1961 c 64 s 2; 1949 c 239 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10163-3.]